Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
211F

HAWAII STRATEGIC DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION

Part I. General Provisions

Section

211F-1 Definitions

211F-2 Establishment of Hawaii strategic
development

corporation; purpose

211F-3 Board of directors; composition

211F-4 Powers of corporation

211F-5 Hawaii strategic development corporation
revolving

fund

211F-5.5 Repealed

211F-5.7 Hydrogen investment capital special fund

211F-6 Contracts for services necessary for
management and

operation of corporation

211F-7 Actions of corporation; guidelines

211F-8 Business and industry evaluation and
priorities for

job opportunity and economic development

211F-9 Meetings of the board

211F-10 Confidentiality of trade secrets or the
like;

disclosure of financial information

211F-11 Requests for assistance from corporation;
procedure

211F-12 Private sector financial support

211F-13 Limitations on debt owed to corporation

211F-14 Limitation on liability

211F-15 Annual report

211F-15.5 HI growth initiative; report to
legislature

211F-16 Annual audit

211F-17 Cooperation with corporation by state
agencies

211F-18 Construction of chapter

Part II. Program for Seed Capital
Assistance

211F-21 Establishment

211F-22 Seed capital investments

211F-23 Purposes and terms of investments

Part III. Program for Venture Capital
Assistance

211F-31 Establishment

211F-32 Venture capital investments

211F-33 Purposes and terms of investments

Part IV. Program for Capital Access

211F-41 Establishment

211F-42 Financial assistance

211F-43 Purposes and priorities required in the
procuring of

insurance, loan guarantees, or letters of
credit

211F-44 Conditions for procuring of insurance,
loan

guarantees, or letters of credit

211F-45 Program for capital access participation
agreements

211F-46 Establishment of special funds to secure
loan

insurance obligations; source of funds

Part V. Hawaii Technology Investment
Program

211F-51 Definitions

211F-52 Formation of Hawaii technology investment
program

211F-53 Limitation of liability

Note

Research and development follow-on funding program through
the Hawaii Technology Development Venture or the National Defense Center of
Excellence for Research in Ocean Sciences (reports to Hawaii strategic
development corporation until funds expended). L 2007, c 267.

Venture accelerator funding program; reports to legislature.
L 2012, c 170.

Revision Note

In this chapter, department or director of business and
economic development changed to department or director of business, economic
development, and tourism.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next